Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-619
Regulation of lotteries; department; duty.

The department shall regulate lotteries conducted by counties, cities, and villages to insure fairness, equity, and uniformity.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 183;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 9-612;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 91.